Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5610
Reinsurance intermediary; examination by director.

A reinsurance intermediary shall be subject to examination by the director. The director shall have access to all books, bank accounts, and records of the reinsurance intermediary in a form usable to the director. The cost of examination shall be paid by the reinsurance intermediary in the manner provided in Chapter 44 for insurance companies.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 64.